Hawaii statutes.
§184-5.3 Failure to obey summons. Any
person who fails to appear at the place and within the time specified in the
summons or citation issued to the person by the state park enforcement officer
upon the person's arrest for violation of the state parks, historical objects
and sites, and outdoor recreation laws and regulations, traffic laws and
ordinances; and the laws of the State and the rules and regulations of the
department relative to the protection and proper utilization of the
recreational, scenic, historical, natural and archaeological, scientific and
related resources of state lands and lands within the conservation district,
shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

If any person fails to comply with a summons or
citation issued to the person, or if any person fails or refuses to deposit
bail as required and within the time permitted, the officer shall cause a
complaint to be entered against the person and secure the issuance of a warrant
for the person's arrest.

When a complaint is made to any prosecuting
officer of the violation of any state parks, historical objects and sites, and
outdoor recreation laws and regulations, traffic laws and ordinances; and the
laws of the State and the rules and regulations of the department relative to
the protection and proper utilization of the recreational, scenic, historical,
natural and archaeological, scientific and related resources of state lands and
lands within the conservation district, the officer who issued the summons or
citation shall subscribe to it under oath administered by another official or
officials of the department of land and natural resources whose names have been
submitted to the prosecuting officer and who have been designated by the
chairperson of the board of land and natural resources to administer the same.
[L 1974, c 245, pt of §2; am L 1975, c 24, §6 and c 87, §1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next